California statutes. Civil Code
A court shall have continuing jurisdiction over an action or cross-complaint filed pursuant to this title in order to provide for the joinder of related causes of action based on the theft of the same person’s identity and the joinder of further defendants based upon the theft of the same person’s identity, regardless of whether a final judgment has been entered as to any defendant. The court’s continuing jurisdiction shall terminate 10 years after filing of the original action unless the court, prior to that date, finds good cause to extend jurisdiction over
 the matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 354, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.96.

Any action brought pursuant to this title or any joinder of a defendant pursuant to Section 1798.82 may be brought within four years of the date the person who alleges that he or she is a victim of identity theft knew or, in the exercise of reasonable diligence, should have known of the existence of facts which would give rise to the bringing of the action or joinder of the defendant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 354, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.97.

(a) This title does not apply to a transaction subject to Section 1747.10.

(b) Nothing is this title shall be construed to affect a claimant’s rights and remedies against a person who perpetrates identity theft or against any person who used or possessed the credit, goods, services, or property obtained by identity theft.

(c) This title is cumulative to the rights and remedies provided under other
 laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 354, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.35. Coerced Debt [1798.97.1. - 1798.97.6.]

1798.97.1.

For purposes of this title, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Adequate documentation” means documentation that identifies a particular debt, or portion thereof, as coerced debt, describes the circumstances under which the coerced debt was incurred, and takes the form of any of the following:

(1) A police report.

(2) A Federal Trade Commission identity theft report identifying a particular debt, or portion thereof, as coerced, but not as identity theft.

(3) A court order issued pursuant to Section 6340 of the Family Code relating to domestic violence, Section 213.5 of
 the Welfare and Institutions Code relating to a dependent or ward of the juvenile court, or Section 15657.03 of the Welfare and Institutions Code relating to elder or dependent adult abuse.

(4) (A) A sworn written certification from a qualified third-party professional based on information they received while acting in a professional capacity.

(B) The documentation described by subparagraph (A) shall be signed by a qualified third-party professional and display the letterhead, address, and telephone number of the office, institution, center, or organization, as appropriate, that engages or employs, whether financially compensated or not, the qualified third-party professional, or, if the qualified third-party professional is self-employed, the documentation shall display the letterhead, address, and telephone number of the qualified third-party
 professional.

(b) “Claim” means a right to payment, whether or not that right is reduced to judgment, liquidated, unliquidated, fixed, contingent, matured, unmatured, disputed, undisputed, legal, or equitable.

(c) (1) “Claimant” means a person or an entity who has or purports to have a claim against a debtor arising from coerced debt, or that person’s or entity’s successor or assignee. “Claimant” includes, but is not limited to, a debt collector or a debt buyer.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), “claimant” shall not include a person who caused the claim described in paragraph (1) to arise through duress, intimidation, threat of force, force, fraud, or undue influence perpetrated against the debtor.

(d) “Coerced debt” means a
 particular debt, or portion thereof, for personal, family, or household use in the name of a debtor who is a victim of domestic violence, or a victim of elder or dependent adult abuse, or a person who is a foster youth, incurred as a result of duress, intimidation, threat of force, force, fraud, or undue influence.

(1) For purposes of this subdivision, “domestic violence” has the same meaning as in Section 6211 of the Family Code.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, “foster youth” has the same meaning as in Section 42238.01 of the Education Code.

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, “dependent adult” has the same meaning as in Section 15610.23 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(4) For the purposes of this subdivision, “elder” has the same meaning as in Section 15610.27 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(e) “Debtor” means a person who owes or is otherwise liable for coerced debt.

(f) “Fraud” means an initial fraudulent act that is perpetrated against the debtor.

(g) “Immediate family member” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 1946.7.

(h) “Person” means a natural person.

(i) “Qualified third-party professional” means any of the following:

(1) A
 domestic violence counselor, as defined in Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code.

(2) A sexual assault counselor, as defined in Section 1035.2 of the Evidence Code.

(3) A Court-Appointed Special Advocate, as defined in Section 101 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(4) A court-appointed attorney, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 317 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(5) A board certified psychiatrist or psychologist.

(6) A licensed marriage and family therapist.

(7) A licensed professional clinical counselor.

(8) A licensed clinical social
 worker.

(9) A social worker or caseworker employed by an adult protective service agency for the purposes described in Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 15750) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(10) A social worker who has completed the child welfare training program described in Article 2 (commencing with Section 16205) of Chapter 3 of Part 4 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(j) (1) “Sworn written certification” means a document in which the author declares under penalty of perjury as true any material fact, and which is accompanied by the following, to the extent that an item listed below is relevant to the debtor’s allegation that the debt is coerced debt:

(A) A copy of the
 debtor’s driver’s license or identification card, as issued by the state.

(B) Any other identification document that supports the statement that the particular debt, or portion thereof, is coerced debt.

(C) An express statement that the debtor did not willingly authorize the use of the debtor’s name or personal information for incurring the coerced debt, and specific facts supporting the claim of coerced debt, if available, and, if not all of the debt was coerced, a statement identifying the portion thereof that was coerced.

(D) Any available correspondence disputing the coerced debt after transaction information has been provided to the debtor.

(E) Information, if known by the debtor, including, but not limited to, a credit card number or loan number,
 that can be used by the claimant to identify the account associated with the coerced debt and the person or persons in whose name the debt was incurred.

(F) The identity of the person or persons who coerced the debtor into incurring the debt and contact information for that person or persons, if known by the debtor, unless the debtor signs a sworn statement that disclosing this information is likely to result in abuse, as defined in Section 6203 of the Family Code, to the debtor or an immediate family member of the debtor.

(G) A telephone number for contacting the person signing the certification concerning any additional information or questions, or direction that further communications to the debtor be in writing only, with the mailing address specified in the statement.

(2) The certification required by this
 subdivision shall be sufficient if it is in substantially the following form:

“I declare under penalty of perjury that the representations made herein are true, correct, and contain no material omissions of fact.

_______(Date and Place)________ _______(Signature)________”

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 989, Sec. 2.   (SB 975)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.97.2.

(a) A person shall not cause another person to incur a coerced debt. A person who causes another person to incur a coerced debt in violation of this subdivision shall be civilly liable to the claimant for the amount of the debt, or portion thereof, determined by a court to be coerced debt, plus the claimant’s attorney’s fees and costs.

(b) Upon receipt of both of the following, a claimant shall cease collection activities until completion of the review provided in subdivision (d):

(1) Adequate documentation.

(2) The debtor’s sworn written certification that a particular debt, or portion thereof, being collected
 is coerced debt.

(c) If a debtor notifies a claimant orally that a particular debt, or portion thereof, being collected is coerced debt, the claimant shall notify the debtor, orally or in writing, that the debtor’s notification must be in writing. If a debtor notifies a claimant in writing that a particular debt, or portion thereof, being collected is coerced debt, but omits information required by subdivision (b), and if the claimant does not cease collection activities, the claimant shall provide written notice to the debtor of the additional information that is required.

(d) (1) Within 10 business days of receiving the complete statement and information described in subdivision (b), the claimant shall, if the claimant furnished adverse information about the debtor to a consumer credit reporting agency, notify the consumer credit reporting agency that the
 account is disputed.

(2) The claimant shall initiate a review considering all of the information provided by the debtor and other information available to the claimant in its file.

(3) Within 10 business days of completing the review, the claimant shall notify the debtor in writing of the claimant’s determination and the good faith basis for that determination.

(4) The claimant shall not recommence collection activities until the debtor has been notified in writing of the good faith determination that the information does not establish that the particular debt, or portion thereof, is coerced debt.

(e) No inference or presumption that the debt is valid or invalid, or that the debtor is liable or not liable for the particular debt, or portion thereof,
 shall arise if the claimant decides after the review described in subdivision (d) to cease or recommence collection activities. The exercise or nonexercise of rights under this section is not a waiver of any other right or defense of the debtor or claimant.

(f) (1) At least 30 days before filing an action pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.97.3 or other action against a claimant in connection with an allegedly coerced debt, a debtor shall submit notice of the debtor’s intent to file an action against the claimant and documents that comply with subdivision (b) in writing to the claimant.

(2) The written notice described in paragraph (1) shall be sent by certified mail, overnight delivery, or other method that allows for confirmation of the delivery date.

(3) The written
 notice described in paragraph (1) shall be sent to an address made available to the debtor by the claimant for receipt of the notice, or, if an address has not been identified by the claimant, to the claimant’s principal place of business as identified by the Secretary of State. If an address is unavailable through the Secretary of State’s website, the debtor may use the correspondence address of the claimant, or in the case of a debt collector, the address on file with the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation for licensing purposes.

(4) (A) The debtor shall not commence an action described in subdivision (a) of Section 1798.97.3 or other action against a claimant in connection with an allegedly coerced debt if the claimant informs the debtor that it has ceased all efforts to collect on the particular debt, or portion thereof, identified in the written notice pursuant to paragraph (1) and the debtor receives
 written notice of this cessation before the expiration of the 30-day period.

(B) The debtor may commence an action described in subdivision (a) of Section 1798.97.3 or other action against a claimant in connection with an allegedly coerced debt if either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(i) The 30-day period described in paragraph (1) expires and the collection activities have not ceased or the debtor has not received written notice that collection activities have ceased.

(ii) The debtor receives written notice pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of the claimant’s good faith determination that the information does not establish that the particular debt, or portion thereof, is coerced debt.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, the
 30-day period shall begin to run when the claimant receives the written notice.

(g) A claimant that ceases collection activities under this section and does not recommence those collection activities shall do both of the following:

(1) If the claimant has furnished adverse information to a consumer credit reporting agency regarding the debtor and a particular debt, or portion thereof, notify the agency to delete that information no later than 10 business days after making its determination.

(2) If the claimant is a debt collector, notify the creditor no later than 10 business days after making its determination that collection activities have been terminated based upon the debtor’s assertion that a particular debt, or portion thereof, being collected is coerced debt.

(h) A claimant that has possession of documents that the debtor is entitled to request from a creditor pursuant to Section 530.8 of the Penal Code may provide those documents to the debtor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 989, Sec. 2.   (SB 975)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.97.3.

(a) (1) A debtor may bring an action against a claimant to establish that a particular debt, or portion thereof, is coerced debt.

(2) In an action brought by a claimant to recover a particular debt against the debtor, the debtor may file a cross-complaint to establish that the particular debt, or portion thereof, is coerced debt. The notice described in subdivision (f) of Section 1798.97.2 shall not be required as a prerequisite to filing a cross-complaint.

(3) A debtor shall plead the allegations of coerced debt with particularity and shall do either of the following:

(A) Attach the
 documents provided to the claimant pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1798.97.2 to any complaint.

(B) Attach the documents identified in subdivision (b) of Section 1798.97.2 to any cross-complaint.

(b) If the debtor establishes by a preponderance of the evidence in an action described in subdivision (a) that the particular debt, or portion thereof, is coerced debt, the debtor shall be entitled to the following relief:

(1) A declaratory judgment that the debtor is not obligated to the claimant on the particular debt, or portion thereof, that is coerced debt.

(2) An injunction prohibiting the claimant from holding or attempting to hold the debtor personally liable on the particular debt, or portion thereof, that is coerced debt, and prohibiting the
 claimant from enforcing a judgment related to the particular debt, or portion thereof, that is coerced debt against the debtor.

(3) An order dismissing any cause of action brought by the claimant to enforce or collect on the particular debt from the debtor or, if only a portion of the debt is established as coerced debt, an order directing that the complaint and judgment, if any, in the action be amended to reflect only the portion of the particular debt that is not coerced debt.

(c) (1) If the debtor establishes by a preponderance of the evidence in an action described in subdivision (a) that the particular debt, or portion thereof, is coerced debt, the court shall issue a judgment in favor of the claimant against the person or persons who coerced the debtor into incurring the debt in the amount of the debt, or portion thereof, that is coerced debt, provided
 that the person or persons who coerced the debtor into incurring the debt or debts has been brought within the jurisdiction of the court and joined as a party to the action and the evidence supports such a judgment.

(2) The court presiding over the action shall take appropriate steps necessary to prevent abuse, as defined in Section 6203 of the Family Code, of the debtor or an immediate family member of the debtor, including, but not limited to, sealing court records, redacting personally identifiable information about the debtor and any immediate family member of the debtor, and directing that any deposition or evidentiary hearing be conducted remotely.

(d) A debtor who files knowingly false motions, pleadings, or other papers or engages in other tactics that are frivolous or intended to cause unnecessary delay against a claimant shall be liable for the claimant’s attorney’s fees
 and costs in defending the lawsuit.

(e) The claimant may move the court to make written findings regarding evidence related to the person who caused the coerced debt to be incurred.

(f) Where some or all of a claim is established as having arisen from coerced debt, a claimant shall have standing, and may use all rights and remedies, to collect by any lawful means that claim, or portion thereof, from the person or persons determined to have coerced the debt, or against a person who used or possessed money, goods, services, or property obtained through coerced debt.

(g) The statute of limitations for a claimant to bring an action to collect coerced debt from any person determined to have coerced the debt shall run from the date of the court’s determination that the person caused the duress, intimidation, threat of
 force, force, fraud, or undue influence giving rise to the coerced debt at issue and shall be brought within five years of that determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 989, Sec. 2.   (SB 975)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.97.4.

(a) This title does not apply to secured debts.

(b) This title does not require a court to order a claimant to refund any moneys already paid on a debt that is determined to be coerced.

(c) This title does not diminish the rights of a claimant to recover payment for a coerced debt from the person or persons who coerced a debtor into incurring that debt.

(d) This title does not reduce or eliminate any other rights or defenses available to a debtor or claimant pursuant to any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 989, Sec. 2.   (SB 975)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.97.5.

(a) Except as set forth in subdivision (b), this title applies only to debts incurred on or after July 1, 2023.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a debtor may file a cross-complaint described by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.97.3 in an action filed by a claimant to collect a debt incurred prior to July 1, 2023, in which case, this title applies to that action, unless a final judgment has been entered in that action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 989, Sec. 2.   (SB 975)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.97.6.

If any provision of this title or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this title that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this title are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 989, Sec. 2.   (SB 975)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.4. PRIVACY OF CUSTOMER ELECTRICAL OR NATURAL GAS USAGE DATA [1798.98. - 1798.99.]

1798.98.

(a) For the purposes of this title, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Business” means a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, association, or other group, however organized and whether or not organized to operate at a profit, including a financial institution organized, chartered, or holding a license or authorization certificate under the law of this state, any other state, the United States, or of any other country, or the parent or the subsidiary of a financial institution.

(2) “Customer” means a customer of an electrical or gas corporation or a local publicly owned electric utility that permits a
 business to have access to data in association with purchasing or leasing a product or obtaining a service from the business.

(3) “Data” means a customer’s electrical or natural gas usage that is made available to the business as part of an advanced metering infrastructure provided by an electrical corporation, a gas corporation, or a local publicly owned electric utility, and includes the name, account number, or physical address of the customer.

(4) “Electrical corporation” has the same meaning as in Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code.

(5) “Gas corporation” has the same meaning as in Section 222 of the Public Utilities Code.

(6) “Local publicly owned
 electric utility” has the same meaning as in Section 224.3 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) Unless otherwise required or authorized by federal or state law, a business shall not share, disclose, or otherwise make accessible to any third party a customer’s data without obtaining the express consent of the customer and conspicuously disclosing to whom the disclosure will be made and how the data will be used.

(c) A business that discloses data, with the express consent of the customer, pursuant to a contract with a nonaffiliated third party, shall require by contract that the third party implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the information, to protect the data from unauthorized access, destruction, use,
 modification, or disclosure.

(d) A business shall implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the information to protect the data from unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.

(e) A business shall not provide an incentive or discount to the customer for accessing the data without the prior consent of the customer.

(f) A business shall take all reasonable steps to dispose, or arrange for the disposal, of customer data within its custody or control when the records are no longer to be retained by the business by (1) shredding, (2) erasing, or (3) otherwise modifying the data in those records to make it unreadable or undecipherable through any
 means.

(g) The provisions of this section do not apply to an electrical corporation, a gas corporation, or a local publicly owned electric utility or a business that secures the data as a result of a contract with an electrical or gas corporation or a local publicly owned electric utility under the provisions of subdivision (f) of Section 8380 or subdivision (f) of 8381 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 188, Sec. 1.   (AB 2788)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.

(a) A customer harmed by the release or unauthorized use of his or her customer data, in violation of Section 1798.98, may bring a civil action to recover actual damages in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each willful violation.

(b) The rights, remedies, and penalties established by this title are in addition to the rights, remedies, or penalties established under any other
 law.

(c) Nothing in this title shall abrogate any authority of the Attorney General to enforce existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   (AB 1274)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.45. The Parent’s Accountability and Child Protection Act [1798.99.1. - 1798.99.1.]

1798.99.1.

(a) (1) A person or business that conducts business in California, and that seeks to sell any product or service in or into California that is illegal under state law to sell to a minor, as described in subdivisions (b) and (c), shall, notwithstanding any general term or condition, take reasonable steps to ensure that the purchaser is of legal age at the time of purchase or delivery, including, but not limited to, verifying the age of the purchaser.

(2) Reasonable steps as used in paragraph (1) for the purchase of items described in subdivision (b) include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Requiring the purchaser or recipient to input, scan, provide, or display a government-issued identification, provided that the person or business complies with all laws governing the retention, use, and disclosure of personally identifiable information, including, but not limited to, subdivision (a) of Section 1749.65, paragraphs (3) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of, and subdivisions (c) to (f), inclusive, of, Section 1798.90, paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.90.1, Sections 1798.29, 1798.81.5, and 1798.82, and Sections 22575 to 22579, inclusive, of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) Requiring the purchaser to use a nonprepaid credit card for an online purchase.

(C) Implementing a system that restricts individuals with accounts
 designated as minor accounts from purchasing the products listed in subdivision (b).

(D) Shipping the product or service to an individual who is of legal age.

(3) Reasonable steps as used in paragraph (1) for the purchase of items described in subdivision (c) include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Requiring the purchaser or recipient to input, scan, provide, or display a government-issued identification, provided that the person or business complies with all laws governing the retention, use, and disclosure of personally identifiable information, including, but not limited to, subdivision (a) of Section 1749.65, paragraphs (3) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of, and subdivisions (c) to (f),
 inclusive, of, Section 1798.90, paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.90.1, Sections 1798.29, 1798.81.5, and 1798.82, and Sections 22575 to 22579, inclusive, of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) Shipping the product or service to an individual who is of legal age.

(4) Reasonable steps as used in paragraph (1) shall not include consent obtained through the minor.

(5) A seller’s reasonable and good faith reliance on bona fide evidence of the purchaser or recipient’s age shall constitute an affirmative defense to any action under this subdivision.

(6) A person or business required to comply with this section shall not retain, use, or disclose any
 information it receives from a purchaser or recipient in an effort to verify age pursuant to this section for any purpose other than as required to comply with, or as needed to demonstrate compliance with, this section, California law, or a state or federal court order.

(b) Products or services that are illegal to sell to a minor under state law that are subject to subdivision (a) include all of the following:

(1) An aerosol container of paint that is capable of defacing property, as referenced in Section 594.1 of the Penal Code.

(2) Etching cream that is capable of defacing property, as referenced in Section 594.1 of the Penal Code.

(3) Dangerous fireworks,
 as referenced in Sections 12505 and 12689 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) Tanning in an ultraviolet tanning device, as referenced in Sections 22702 and 22706 of the Business and Professions Code.

(5) Dietary supplement products containing ephedrine group alkaloids, as referenced in Section 110423.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(6) Body branding, as referenced in Sections 119301 and 119302 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Products or services that are illegal to sell to a minor under state law that are subject to subdivision (a) include all of the following:

(1) Firearms or handguns, as
 referenced in Sections 16520, 16640, and 27505 of the Penal Code.

(2) A BB device, as referenced in Sections 16250 and 19910 of the Penal Code.

(3) Ammunition or reloaded ammunition, as referenced in Sections 16150 and 30300 of the Penal Code.

(4) Any tobacco, cigarette, cigarette papers, blunt wraps, any other preparation of tobacco, any other instrument or paraphernalia that is designed for the smoking or ingestion of tobacco, products prepared from tobacco, or any controlled substance, as referenced in Division 8.5 (commencing with Section 22950) of the Business and Professions Code, and Sections 308, 308.1, 308.2, and 308.3 of the Penal Code.

(5) Electronic cigarettes, as referenced in Section 119406 of the Health and Safety Code.

(6) A less lethal weapon, as referenced in Sections 16780 and 19405 of the Penal Code.

(d) In an action brought by a public prosecutor, a business or person that violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not exceeding seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) for each violation.

(e) The provisions of this section do not apply to a business that is regulated by state or federal law providing greater protection to personal information or requiring greater age verification than provided by this section in regard to the subjects addressed by this section. Compliance with state or federal law shall be deemed
 compliance with this section with regard to those subjects. This subdivision does not relieve a business from a duty to comply with any other requirements of other state and federal law regarding the protection and privacy of personal information or age verification.

(f) For purposes of this section, a government-issued identification means any of the following:

(1) A document issued by a federal, state, county, or municipal government, or subdivision or agency thereof, including, but not limited to, an identification card or a valid motor vehicle operator’s license, including licenses or identification cards issued pursuant to Section 12801.9 of the Vehicle Code, that contains the name, date of birth, description, and picture of the person.

(2) A valid passport issued by the United States or by a foreign government.

(3) A valid identification card issued to a member of the United States Armed Forces that includes the date of birth and picture of the person.

(4) A valid consular identification document.

(5) An identification card issued by a federally recognized tribal government.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 482, Sec. 1.   (AB 1766)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.46. Online Violence Prevention Act [1798.99.20. - 1798.99.23.]

1798.99.20.

For purposes of this section:

(a) (1) “Content” means statements or comments made by users and media that are created, posted, shared, or otherwise interacted with by users on an internet-based service or application.

 (2) “Content” does not include media put on a service or application exclusively for the purpose of cloud storage, transmitting
 files, or file
 collaboration.

(b) “Social media platform” means a public or semipublic internet-based service or application that has users in California and that meets both of the following criteria:

(1) (A) A substantial function of the service or application is to connect users in order to allow users to interact
 socially with each other within the service or application.

(B) A service or application that provides email or direct messaging services shall not be considered to meet this criterion on the basis of that function alone.

(2) The service or application allows users to do all of the following:

(A) Construct a public or semipublic profile for purposes of signing into and using the service or application.

(B) Populate a list of other users with whom an individual shares a social connection within the system.

(C) Create or post content viewable by other users, including, but not
 limited to, on message boards, in chat rooms, or through a landing page or main feed that presents the user with content generated by other users.

(c) “Public or semipublic internet-based service or application” does not include a service or application used to facilitate communication with a business or enterprise among employees or affiliates of the business or enterprise, provided that access to the service or application is restricted to employees or affiliates of the business or enterprise using the service or application.

(d) “User” means a person with an account on a social media platform.

(e) “Violent post” means content on a social media platform that contains a true threat against a specific person that
 is not protected by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 881, Sec. 1.   (SB 1056)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.21.

(a) A social media platform shall clearly and conspicuously state whether it has a mechanism for reporting violent posts that is available to users and nonusers of the platform.

(b) If the social media platform has a reporting mechanism, the statement required by this subdivision shall include a link to the reporting mechanism.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 881, Sec. 1.   (SB 1056)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.22.

(a) (1) (A) A person who is the target of a violent post, or reasonably believes the person is the target of a violent post, may seek an order requiring the social media platform to remove the violent post and any related violent post the court determines shall be removed in the interests of justice.

 (B) (i) A person may bring an action pursuant to this paragraph before 48 hours have passed since providing notice to a social media platform pursuant to paragraph (2), but the court shall not rule on the request for an order until 48 hours have passed from the provision of notice.

(ii) The court may dismiss an action described by clause (i) if the social media platform deletes the post before 48 hours have passed from the provision of notice.

(C) Except as provided in subparagraph (D), a person may bring an action pursuant to this paragraph at any time, and the court may rule on the request at any time, if the social media platform does not have a reporting mechanism described in Section 1798.99.21.

(D) A person shall not bring an action pursuant to this paragraph, nor shall a court issue an order requiring a social medial platform to remove a violent post or any related violent post, based upon content containing a true threat against a specific person if the date and time when the true
 threat that was threatened to occur has passed.

(2) If the social media platform has a reporting mechanism described in Section 1798.99.21, a person shall not bring an action
 pursuant to paragraph (1) until the person has notified the social media platform of the violent post and requested that it be removed through the reporting mechanism.

(b) (1) A court shall award court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to a prevailing plaintiff in an action brought pursuant to this section.

(2) Reasonable attorney’s fees may be awarded to a prevailing defendant upon a finding by the court that the plaintiff’s prosecution of the action was not in good faith.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 881, Sec. 1.   (SB 1056)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.23.

This title does not apply to a social media platform with fewer than 1,000,000 discrete monthly users.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 881, Sec. 1.   (SB 1056)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.47. The California Age-Appropriate Design Code Act [1798.99.28. - 1798.99.40.]

1798.99.28.

This title shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Age-Appropriate Design Code Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.   (AB 2273)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.29.

The Legislature declares that children should be afforded protections not only by online products and services specifically directed at them but by all online products and services they are likely to access and makes the following findings:

(a) Businesses that develop and provide online services, products, or features that children are likely to access should consider the best interests of children when designing, developing, and providing that online service, product, or feature.

(b) If a conflict arises between commercial interests and the best interests of children, companies should prioritize the privacy, safety, and well-being of children over commercial
 interests.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.   (AB 2273)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.30.

(a) For purposes of this title, the definitions in Section 1798.140 shall apply unless otherwise specified in this title.

(b) For the purposes of this title:

(1) “Child” or “children,” unless otherwise specified, means a consumer or consumers who are under 18 years of age.

(2) “Data Protection Impact Assessment” means a systematic survey to assess and mitigate risks that arise from the data management practices of the business to children who are reasonably likely to access the online service, product, or feature at issue that arises from the provision of that online service, product, or feature.

(3) “Default” means a preselected option adopted by the business for the online service, product, or feature.

(4) “Likely to be accessed by children” means it is reasonable to expect, based on the following indicators, that the online service, product, or feature would be accessed by children:

(A) The online service, product, or feature is directed to children as defined by the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.).

(B) The online service, product, or feature is determined, based on competent and reliable evidence regarding audience composition, to be routinely accessed by a significant number of children.

(C) An online service, product, or feature with
 advertisements marketed to children.

(D) An online service, product, or feature that is substantially similar or the same as an online service, product, or feature subject to subparagraph (B).

(E) An online service, product, or feature that has design elements that are known to be of interest to children, including, but not limited to, games, cartoons, music, and celebrities who appeal to children.

(F) A significant amount of the audience of the online service, product, or feature is determined, based on internal company research, to be children.

(5) “Online service, product, or feature” does not mean any of the following:

(A) A broadband internet access service, as defined in Section
 3100.

 (B) A telecommunications service, as defined in Section 153 of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(C) The delivery or use of a physical product.
